New Jersey, session 222, A3658.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In addition to the requirements of any other law, rule, regulation, or order, within one year after the effective date of this act, each State entity shall: (1)   provide for the source separation and recycling of any recyclable aluminum, corrugated cardboard, glass, paper, or plastic waste generated at each building or facility owned, leased, or operated by the State entity; (2)   establish procedures for the collection and storage of any materials to be recycled pursuant to subsection a. of this section, and make necessary contractual arrangements for the collection, transportation, and recycling of those materials by individuals or entities licensed to do so; and (3)   provide adequate recycling receptacles, signage, information, education, and staffing at each building or facility owned, leased, or operated by the State entity to ensure compliance with this section.  Receptacles shall be made available to both State employees and members of the public. b.    The requirements of subsection a. of this section shall not apply to any building or facility located in a State park or forest where the Department of Environmental Protection is implementing a carry-in, carry-out trash program in which visitors to the State park or forest are required to take their trash with them upon departing the State park or forest. c.     Within 180 days after the effective date of this act, the Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall prepare and distribute guidance to assist State entities in complying with the requirements of this section. d.   The Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall work with the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Legislature to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section by the Judicial and Legislative Branches of State Government, respectively. e.    The Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, may adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), any rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this act. f.    As used in this section State entity means any branch, department, agency, or office of State government, including a State university or college, or an authority created by the State. State park or forest means the same as the term State parks and forests is defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1983, c.324 (C.13:1L-3). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.